Nevada, session 83, AB389.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 385A.080 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
385A.080 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall:
(a) Prescribe forms for the reports required pursuant to NRS
385A.070 and provide the forms to the respective school districts,
the State Public Charter School Authority, each college or university
within the Nevada System of Higher Education and each city or
county that sponsors a charter school.
(b) Provide statistical information and technical assistance to the
school districts, the State Public Charter School Authority, each
college or university within the Nevada System of Higher Education
and each city or county that sponsors a charter school to ensure that
the reports provide comparable information with respect to each
school in each district, each charter school and among the districts
and charter schools throughout this State.
(c) Consult with a representative of the:
(1) Nevada State Education Association;
(2) Nevada Association of School Boards;
(3) Nevada Association of School Administrators;
(4) Nevada Parent Teacher Association;
(5) Budget Division of the Office of Finance;
(6) Legislative Counsel Bureau; and
(7) Charter School Association of Nevada,
 concerning the program adopted pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS
385A.070 and consider any advice or recommendations submitted
by the representatives with respect to the program.
(d) Establish metrics of performance for public schools for each
grade which include, without limitation, metrics for:
(1) The growth and proficiency of pupils in literacy,
mathematics and science;
(2) The engagement and proficiency of pupils in courses for
college and career readiness; and
(3) The retention and recruitment of teachers and education
support professionals.
2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may consult with
representatives of parent groups other than the Nevada Parent
Teacher Association concerning the program adopted pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 385A.070 and consider any advice or
recommendations submitted by the representatives with respect to
the program.
3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction and each school
district and charter school shall:
-
*AB389_R1*

– 5 –
(a) Publish the metrics established pursuant to paragraph (d) of
subsection 1 on their respective Internet websites; and
(b) On or before October 1 of each year, report data relating to
each metric established pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 to
the Governor, the State Board and the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmission to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education.
4. To obtain the information necessary to report data on
metrics of performance for public schools, the Superintendent of
Public Instruction shall, to the greatest extent possible, use
information that has previously been submitted to the
Superintendent or the Department and avoid duplicative requests
for information.
Sec. 2. NRS 385A.810 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.810 The board of trustees of each school district shall:
1. Adopt and maintain the program prescribed by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to NRS 385A.820 for
the collection, validation and maintenance of electronic records of
individual pupils and the transfer of data from [the] such electronic
records [of individual pupils] by the school district, the sponsor of
each charter school and each university school for profoundly
gifted pupils to the automated system of information [, including,
without limitation, the development of plans for the educational
technology which is necessary to adopt and maintain the program;]
established by the Department pursuant to NRS 385A.800;
2. Provide to the Department electronic data concerning pupils
[as required] in accordance with the program prescribed by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to NRS 385A.820 [;] ,
including, without limitation, the data required to be reported
pursuant to NRS 385A.840 and any other data requested by the
Department to carry out its functions or required to be reported to
the Department by state or federal law or regulations; and
3. Ensure that an electronic record is maintained in accordance
with subsection 3 of NRS 385A.830.
Sec. 3. NRS 385A.820 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.820 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall:
[1.] (a) Prescribe a uniform program throughout this State for
the collection, validation and maintenance of electronic records of
individual pupils and the transfer of data [that] from such
electronic records, which each school district must adopt [,] and
which must include standardized software;
[2.] (b) Prescribe the data to be collected and reported to the
Department by each school district and each sponsor of a charter
school pursuant to NRS 385A.810 and by each university school for
profoundly gifted pupils;
-
*AB389_R1*

– 6 –
[3.] (c) Prescribe the format for the data;
[4.] (d) Prescribe the date by which each school district shall
report the data to the Department;
[5.] (e) Prescribe the date by which each charter school shall
report the data to the sponsor of the charter school;
[6.] (f) Prescribe the date by which each university school for
profoundly gifted pupils shall report the data to the Department;
[7.] (g) Prescribe standardized codes for all data elements used
within the automated system and all exchanges of data within the
automated system, including, without limitation, data concerning:
[(a)] (1) Individual pupils;
[(b)] (2) Individual teachers;
[(c)] (3) Individual schools and school districts; and
[(d)] (4) Programs and financial information;
[8.] (h) Provide technical assistance to each school district to
ensure that the data from each public school in the school district,
including, without limitation, each charter school and university
school for profoundly gifted pupils located within the school
district, is compatible with the automated system of information and
comparable to the data reported by other school districts; and
[9.] (i) Provide for the analysis and reporting of the data in the
automated system of information.
2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may deduct
money from the apportionment otherwise due to a school district,
charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils
pursuant to NRS 387.124 to compensate the Department for costs
to collect, validate and maintain electronic records of individual
pupils and financial accountability information as necessary to
report on pupil achievement and financial accountability on
behalf of the school district, charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils, including, without limitation, costs to
purchase licenses for software to collect, validate and maintain
such electronic records and financial accountability information.
Sec. 4. Chapter 387 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Commission on Innovation and Excellence in
Education created by NRS 385.910 shall:
(a) Review the reporting, tracking, monitoring, analyzing and
dissemination of data relating to pupil achievement and financial
accountability for the purpose of identifying and recommending
the elimination of any reporting that is redundant or does not
effectively provide measurable and informative data with which to
assess and improve the educational programs and priorities of this
State.
(b) Collaborate with the Department to:
-
*AB389_R1*

– 7 –
(1) Gather input relating to paragraph (a) from all
interested persons and entities; and
(2) Establish a centralized repository of all reports of data
relating to pupil achievement and financial accountability and
make the centralized repository easily accessible on the Internet
website of the Department.
(c) Develop a framework for the reporting of data relating to
pupil achievement and financial accountability that ensures that
data reported to the Department:
(1) Identifies areas of proficiency and growth of pupils in
this State;
(2) Identifies gaps in achievement among groups of pupils;
(3) Provides clear, actionable data to enable the
development of policies and practices to improve educational
outcomes in this State; and
(4) Is incorporated into the centralized repository
established pursuant to paragraph (b) and is organized into
portals or tabs that feature information of interest and value to
interested parties, including, without limitation, the Department,
school districts, schools, administrators, teachers and support
staff, elected officials and parents.
2. The Commission shall:
(a) Present any recommendations developed pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 at a meeting of the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education for consideration and comment
by the Committee. The recommendations must include, without
limitation, recommendations for:
(1) The elimination of any requirements for the reporting
of data that are redundant or do not effectively provide
measurable and informative data with which to assess and
improve the educational programs and priorities of this State; and
(2) Any amendments of existing requirements for the
reporting of data that will enhance the effectiveness and
alignment of the reporting with the educational programs and
priorities of this State.
(b) On or before September 30 of each year, after
consideration of any comments on the recommendations made by
the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education, transmit the
recommendations developed pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 or a revised version of such recommendations to the
Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
distribution to the Legislature.
3. Upon the request of the Chair of the Senate Standing
Committee on Education or the Assembly Standing Committee on
Education, the Commission shall present the recommendations
-
*AB389_R1*

– 8 –
developed pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 to the
applicable Committee for the purpose of informing legislative
decision-making and policy development.
Sec. 5. NRS 387.12463 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.12463 1. The Commission shall:
(a) Provide guidance to school districts and the Department on
the implementation of the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan.
(b) Monitor the implementation of the Pupil-Centered Funding
Plan and make any recommendations to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education that the Commission determines would,
within the limits of appropriated funding, improve the
implementation of the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan or correct any
deficiencies of the Department or any school district or public
school in carrying out the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan.
(c) Review the statewide base per pupil funding amount, the
adjusted base per pupil funding for each school district and the
multiplier for weighted funding for each category of pupils
appropriated by law pursuant to NRS 387.1214 for each biennium
and recommend any revisions the Commission determines to be
appropriate to create an optimal level of funding for the public
schools in this State, including, without limitation, by
recommending the creation or elimination of one or more categories
of pupils to receive additional weighted funding. If the Commission
makes a recommendation pursuant to this paragraph which would
require more money to implement than was appropriated from the
State Education Fund in the immediately preceding biennium, the
Commission shall also identify a method to fully fund
the recommendation within 10 years after the date of the
recommendation.
(d) Review the laws and regulations of this State relating to
education, make recommendations to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education for any revision of such laws and
regulations that the Commission determines would improve the
efficiency or effectiveness of public education in this State and
notify each school district of each such recommendation.
(e) Review and recommend to the Department revisions of the
cost adjustment factors for each county established pursuant to NRS
387.1215 and the method for calculating the attendance area
adjustment established pursuant to NRS 387.1218.
(f) Review the academic progress made by pupils in each public
school since the implementation of the Pupil-Centered Funding
Plan, including, without limitation, any changes to the academic
progress of such pupils as the result of any additional money
provided to each such school by the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan.
In performing such a review, the Commission shall:
-
*AB389_R1*

– 9 –
(1) Use metrics to measure the academic achievement of
pupils which include, without limitation:
(I) The rate of graduation of pupils from high school by
type of diploma;
(II) The performance of pupils on standardized
examinations in math, reading and science;
(III) The number of credentials or other certifications in
fields of career and technical education earned by pupils;
(IV) The number of pupils who earn a passing score on an
advanced placement examination;
(V) The number of pupils who earn a passing score on an
international baccalaureate examination;
(VI) The percentage of pupils in each school who lack a
sufficient number of credits to graduate by the end of their 12th
grade year;
(VII) The percentage of pupils in each school who drop
out;
(VIII) The number of pupils who enroll in higher
education upon graduation;
(IX) The number of pupils who enroll in a vocational or
technical school or apprenticeship training program;
(X) The attendance rate for pupils;
(XI) The number of violent acts by pupils and
disciplinary actions against pupils; and
(XII) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(2) Use metrics to measure the improvement of pupils
enrolled in elementary school in literacy which include, without
limitation:
(I) The literacy rate for pupils in the first, third and fifth
grades;
(II) The number of pupils in elementary school who were
promoted to the next grade after testing below proficient in reading
in the immediately preceding school year, separated by grade level
and by level of performance on the relevant test;
(III) The number of schools that employ a licensed
teacher designated to serve as a literacy specialist pursuant to NRS
388.159 and the number of schools that fail to employ and designate
such a licensed teacher; and
(IV) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(3) Use metrics to measure the ability of public schools to
hire and retain sufficient staff to meet the needs of the public
schools which include, without limitation:
(I) The rate of vacancies in positions for teachers, support
staff and administrators;
(II) The attendance rate for teachers;
-
*AB389_R1*

– 10 –
(III) The retention rate for teachers;
(IV) The number of schools and classrooms within each
school in which the number of pupils in attendance exceeds the
designed capacity for the school or classroom;
(V) The number of classes taught by a substitute teacher
for more than 25 percent of the school year; and
(VI) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(4) Use metrics to measure the extent to which schools meet
the needs and expectations of pupils, parents or legal guardians of
pupils, teachers and administrators which include, without
limitation:
(I) The results of an annual survey of satisfaction of
school employees;
(II) The results of an annual survey of satisfaction of
pupils, parents or legal guardians of pupils and graduates; and
(III) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(5) Identify the progress made by each school, school district
and charter school on improving the literacy of pupils enrolled in
elementary school;
(6) Make recommendations for strategies to increase the
efficacy, efficiency, transparency and accountability of public
schools; and
(7) Make recommendations to the Department, school
districts and charter schools to improve the reporting, tracking,
monitoring, analyzing and dissemination of data relating to pupil
achievement and financial accountability, including, without
limitation, revisions to the metrics identified in subparagraphs (1) to
(4), inclusive.
(g) Review and consider strategies to improve the accessibility
and ensure the equitability of existing and new programs for pupils
within and between public schools, including, without limitation,
open zoning.
2. [Each school district and each charter school shall submit a
quarterly report to] On an annual basis, the Commission [that
identifies] shall review data and metrics to identify how funding
from the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan is being used to improve the
academic performance and progress of pupils . [and includes,] The
data and metrics reviewed pursuant to this subsection may
include, without limitation, all data or metrics collected and
submitted by [the] a school district or charter school , and all data
or metrics previously reported by a school district or charter
school to the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the
Department, to demonstrate such improvement. A school district or
charter school must not be required to submit data or metrics for a
review pursuant to this subsection if the school district or charter
-
*AB389_R1*

– 11 –
school has previously reported the data or metrics to the
Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Department. The
Commission shall [review the reports submitted pursuant to this
subsection and transmit the reports,] report the results of a review
pursuant to this subsection, along with any commentary or
recommendations relating to the [reports,] review, to the Governor,
the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau, the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education and the Interim Finance
Committee.
3. After receiving [the reports] a report submitted to the
Commission pursuant to subsection 2, the Governor may, with the
approval of the Legislature or Interim Finance Committee if the
Legislature is not in session, direct a school district or charter school
to take such remedial actions as the Governor determines to be
necessary and appropriate to address any deficiency identified in the
[reports] report submitted pursuant to subsection 2.
4. The Commission shall:
(a) Present any recommendations pursuant to paragraphs (a) to
(g), inclusive, of subsection 1 at a meeting of the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education for consideration and
recommendations by the Committee; and
(b) After consideration of the recommendations of the Joint
Interim Standing Committee on Education, transmit the
recommendations or a revised version of the recommendations to
the Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
distribution to the Legislature.
Sec. 6. NRS 387.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.320 [1.] During each quarter of each school year, the
clerk of the board of trustees of a county school district shall cause
to be published on the Internet website of the county school district
a list of expenditures of the county school district made during the
previous quarter school year. The published list of expenditures
shall be in the form prescribed by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction.
[2. The publication required by subsection 1 shall be printed in
some newspaper published and of general circulation in the county
the boundaries of which are conterminous with the boundaries of the
county school district.
3. The newspaper described in subsection 2 must possess the
qualifications prescribed in chapter 238 of NRS.
4. If no qualified newspaper is published within a county, then
the required publication shall be printed in some qualified
newspaper printed in the State of Nevada and having a general
circulation within the county.]
-
*AB389_R1*

– 12 –
Sec. 7. NRS 388.700 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.700 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, for
[each school quarter of] a school year, the ratio in each school
district of pupils per licensed teacher designated to teach, on a full-
time basis, in classes where core curriculum is taught:
(a) In kindergarten and grades 1 and 2, must not exceed 16 to 1,
and in grade 3, must not exceed 18 to 1; or
(b) If a plan is approved pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
388.720, must not exceed the ratio set forth in that plan for the grade
levels specified in the plan.
 In determining this ratio, all licensed educational personnel who
teach a grade level specified in paragraph (a) or a grade level
specified in a plan that is approved pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
388.720, as applicable for the school district, must be counted
except teachers of art, music, physical education or special
education, teachers who teach one or two specific subject areas to
more than one classroom of pupils, counselors, librarians,
administrators, deans, specialists, any administrators or other
licensed educational personnel, including, without limitation,
counselors, coaches and special education teachers, who may be
present in a classroom but do not teach every pupil in the classroom
and teachers who are not actively teaching pupils during a class
period or who do not teach a subject area for which the ratio of
pupils per licensed teacher is being determined.
2. A school district may, within the limits of any plan adopted
pursuant to NRS 388.720, assign a pupil whose enrollment in a
grade occurs after the [end of a quarter during the] beginning of a
school year to any existing class regardless of the number of pupils
in the class if the school district requests and is approved for a
variance from the State Board pursuant to subsection 4 [.] for the
school year.
3. Each school district that includes one or more elementary
schools which exceed the ratio of pupils per class during any
[quarter of a] school year, as reported to the Department pursuant to
NRS 388.725:
(a) Set forth in subsection 1;
(b) Prescribed in conjunction with a legislative appropriation for
the support of the class-size reduction program; or
(c) Defined by a legislatively approved alternative class-size
reduction plan, if applicable to that school district,
 must request a variance for each such school for [the next quarter
of the current school year if a quarter remains in that school year or
for the next quarter of] the succeeding school year [, as applicable,]
from the State Board by providing a written statement that includes
the reasons for the request, the justification for exceeding the
-
*AB389_R1*

– 13 –
applicable prescribed ratio of pupils per class and a plan of actions
that the school district will take to reduce the ratio of pupils per
class.
4. The State Board may grant to a school district a variance
from the limitation on the number of pupils per class set forth in
paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of subsection 3 for good cause, including
the lack of available financial support specifically set aside for the
reduction of pupil-teacher ratios.
5. The State Board shall, on [a quarterly] an annual basis,
submit a report to the Interim Finance Committee on each variance
requested by a school district pursuant to subsection 4 during the
preceding [quarter] school year and, if a variance was granted, an
identification of each elementary school for which a variance was
granted and the specific justification for the variance.
6. [The State Board shall, on or before February 1 of each odd-
numbered year, submit a report to the Legislature on:
(a) Each variance requested by a school district pursuant to
subsection 4 during the preceding biennium and, if a variance was
granted, an identification of each elementary school for which
variance was granted and the specific justification for the variance.
(b) The data reported to it by the various school districts
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 388.710, including an explanation
of that data, and the current pupil-teacher ratios per class in the
grade levels specified in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or the grade
levels specified in a plan that is approved pursuant to subsection 3
of NRS 388.720, as applicable for the school district.
7.] The Department shall, on or before November 15 of each
year, report to the Chief of the Budget Division of the Office of
Finance and the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau:
(a) The number of teachers employed full-time;
(b) The number of teachers employed in order to attain the ratio
required by subsection 1;
(c) The number of substitute teachers filling vacancies or long-
term positions;
(d) The number of pupils enrolled; and
(e) The number of teachers assigned to teach in the same
classroom with another teacher or in any other arrangement other
than one teacher assigned to one classroom of pupils,
 during the current school year in the grade levels specified in
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or the grade levels specified in a plan
that is approved pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 388.720, as
applicable, for each school district.
-
*AB389_R1*

– 14 –
[8.] 7. The provisions of this section do not apply to a charter
school or to a program of distance education provided pursuant to
NRS 388.820 to 388.874, inclusive.
Sec. 8. NRS 388.723 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.723 The Department shall:
1. Develop policies and procedures for:
(a) Monitoring the plan of each school district to reduce the
pupil-teacher ratio per class developed pursuant to NRS 388.720,
which must include, without limitation, provisions for:
(1) The review of each plan submitted to the State Board to
ensure the adequacy of such plans; and
(2) The review of any data submitted to the State Board
pursuant to NRS 388.710.
(b) Monitoring the [quarterly] reports concerning the average
daily enrollment of pupils and the pupil-teacher ratios in each school
district submitted by the board of trustees of the school district
pursuant to NRS 388.725 to ensure the completeness and accuracy
of such reports.
(c) The review of any requests for a variance submitted to the
State Board pursuant to NRS 388.700, which must include, without
limitation, provisions to verify the information in such requests to
ensure the accuracy of the reports on variances submitted by the
State Board to the [Legislature] Interim Finance Committee
pursuant to that section.
(d) The distribution of money to each school district for the
reduction of pupil-teacher ratios, which must include, without
limitation, provisions for:
(1) The retention of all documents and records related to the
distribution; and
(2) The review of the work performed to determine the
distribution of such money to ensure the accuracy of supporting
information and the calculations used in making such
determinations.
2. Provide guidance to the school districts on:
(a) The development of a plan to reduce the pupil-teacher ratio
per class pursuant to NRS 388.720. In developing such guidance,
the Department shall:
(1) Outline the criteria that each plan must include to meet
the requirements of NRS 388.720.
(2) Provide examples of policies, plans or strategies adopted
by other states to reduce class sizes.
(b) The requirements for reporting information related to the
reduction of pupil-teacher ratios.
-
*AB389_R1*

– 15 –
(c) The data that must be monitored pursuant to NRS 388.710
by each school district and used to measure the effectiveness of the
implementation of any plan to reduce pupil-teacher ratios.
3. Communicate with the board of trustees of each school
district regarding the expectations of the Department for the use of
any money distributed to reduce pupil-teacher ratios in the school
district, including, without limitation, the minimum number of
teachers the school district is expected to employ.
Sec. 9. NRS 388.725 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.725 1. On or before August 1 [, November 1, February 1
and May 1] of each year, the board of trustees of each school district
shall report to the Department for the preceding [quarter:] school
year:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), the average
daily enrollment of pupils and the ratio of pupils per licensed
teacher for grades 1, 2 and 3 for each elementary school in the
school district.
(b) If the State Board has approved an alternative class-size
reduction plan for the school district pursuant to NRS 388.720, the
average daily enrollment of pupils and the ratio of pupils per
licensed teacher for those grades which are required to comply with
the alternative class-size reduction plan for each elementary school
in the school district.
2. The board of trustees of each school district shall post on the
Internet website maintained by the school district:
(a) The information concerning average daily enrollment and
class size for each elementary school in the school district, as
reported to the Department pursuant to subsection 1; and
(b) An identification of each elementary school in the school
district, if any, for which a variance from the prescribed pupil-
teacher ratios was granted by the State Board pursuant to subsection
4 of NRS 388.700.
Sec. 10. NRS 354.6015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
354.6015 1. [Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
the] The governing board of a local government shall:
(a) [Submit] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
submit electronically a fiscal report of the local government to the
Department of Taxation in accordance with the requirements
prescribed by the Committee on Local Government Finance
pursuant to subsection 2; and
(b) [Publish] Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph,
publish a summary of the fiscal report, which must contain the
information required by the Committee on Local Government
Finance pursuant to subsection 2, in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county in which the local government is situated.
-
*AB389_R1*

– 16 –
The board of trustees of a county school district is not required to
prepare or publish a summary of the fiscal report of the county
school district pursuant to this paragraph.
2. The Committee on Local Government Finance shall
prescribe, by regulation:
(a) The dates and times for filing a fiscal report, which must
require a local government to file at least one fiscal report per year;
(b) The content of a fiscal report, which must include, without
limitation, revenues, expenditures, fund balances, cash balances,
components of assessed value, debt schedules and any other
information that the Committee on Local Government Finance
determines to be appropriate for determining the financial status of a
local government;
(c) The content for a summary of a fiscal report that must be
published pursuant to subsection 1; and
(d) A uniform method for creating and submitting a fiscal report
electronically pursuant to this section. The method must facilitate
the storage and reproduction of the fiscal report in electronic format
by the Department of Taxation.
3. The Committee on Local Government Finance may
establish, by regulation, an exception to the requirement that a fiscal
report be submitted to the Department of Taxation in electronic
format. The exception must be limited to local governments that the
Committee determines do not have the financial ability to comply
with the method for submitting a fiscal report to the Department of
Taxation prescribed by the Committee. If the Committee on Local
Government Finance provides an exception pursuant to this
subsection, the Committee shall provide, by regulation, specific
standards that it will use to determine whether a local government
qualifies for an exemption pursuant to this subsection.
4. The Committee on Local Government Finance shall adopt
regulations pursuant to this section in the manner prescribed for
state agencies in chapter 233B of NRS.
Sec. 10.5. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380
do not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 11. NRS 387.206 and 387.2062 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 12. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
-
*AB389_R1*

– 17 –
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTIONS
387.206 Recommended minimum expenditure by school
districts, charter schools and university schools for profoundly
gifted pupils for textbooks, instructional supplies, instructional
software and instructional hardware.
1. On or before August 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
Department, in consultation with the Budget Division of the Office
of Finance and the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau, shall determine a recommended minimum amount
of money to be expended during each fiscal year of a biennium for
textbooks, instructional supplies, instructional software and
instructional hardware by all school districts, charter schools and
university schools for profoundly gifted pupils. The amount must be
determined by increasing the amount that was established for the
Fiscal Year 2004-2005 by the percentage of the change in
enrollment between Fiscal Year 2004-2005 and the fiscal year for
which the amount is being established, plus any inflationary
adjustment approved by the Legislature after Fiscal Year
2004-2005.
2. The Department, in consultation with the Budget Division of
the Office of Finance and the Fiscal Analysis Division of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau, shall develop or revise, as applicable, a
formula for determining the minimum amount of money that each
school district, charter school and university school for profoundly
gifted pupils is recommended to expend each fiscal year for
textbooks, instructional supplies, instructional software and
instructional hardware. The sum of all of the minimum amounts
determined pursuant to this subsection must be equal to the
combined minimum amount determined pursuant to subsection 1.
The formula must be used only to develop expenditure
recommendations and must not be used to alter the yearly
apportionment from the State Education Fund to school districts,
charter schools or university schools for profoundly gifted pupils.
3. Upon approval of the formula pursuant to subsection 2, the
Department shall provide written notice to each school district,
charter school and university school for profoundly gifted pupils on
or before August 15 of each odd-numbered year that sets forth the
recommended minimum combined amount of money that the school
district, charter school and university school for profoundly gifted
pupils may expend for textbooks, instructional supplies,
-
*AB389_R1*

– 18 –
instructional software and instructional hardware for each fiscal year
of a biennium.
387.2062 Report concerning failure to comply with
recommended minimum expenditure.
1. On or before January 1 of each year, the Department shall
determine whether each school district, charter school and university
school for profoundly gifted pupils has expended, during the
immediately preceding fiscal year, the recommended minimum
amount of money set forth in the notice provided pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 387.206. In making this determination, the
Department shall use the report submitted by:
(a) The school district pursuant to NRS 387.303.
(b) The charter school pursuant to NRS 388A.345.
(c) The university school for profoundly gifted pupils pursuant
to NRS 388C.250.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, if the
Department determines that a school district, charter school or
university school for profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable, has not
expended the recommended minimum amount of money set forth in
the notice or the revised notice, as applicable, provided pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 387.206, the Department shall publish a report
on an Internet website maintained by the Department which
identifies the difference between the actual combined expenditure
for textbooks, instructional supplies, instructional software and
instructional hardware and the minimum recommended combined
expenditure set forth in the notice provided pursuant to subsection 3
of NRS 387.206.
3. If the actual enrollment of pupils in a school district, charter
school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils is less than
the enrollment included in the projections used in the biennial
budget of the school district submitted pursuant to NRS 387.303, the
budget of the charter school submitted pursuant to NRS 388A.345
or the report of the university school for profoundly gifted pupils
submitted pursuant to NRS 388C.250, as applicable, the
recommended expenditure for textbooks, instructional supplies,
instructional software and instructional hardware pursuant to NRS
387.206 must be reduced proportionately.
H
-
*AB389_R1*